Washington statutes.
RCW 36.160.010

Findings—Intent.

(1) The legislature finds that:

(a) Many Washington cities and counties and their residents are experiencing the lingering effects of the recession. While there are many residents who have been able to successfully weather the economic downturn, unfortunately there are still individuals, families, and valued community organizations who have not. Local governments also have not been immune to this situation. Local government revenues have continued to lag behind economic growth, leaving local communities unable to make adequate and necessary investments in infrastructure and services their residents rely on and benefit from. Additional fiscal tools that provide funding for facilities, services, housing, and programs benefiting vulnerable populations as well as cultural organizations will enable local communities and their residents to choose to invest in their local institutional and human infrastructure to the benefit of the public.

(b) There is a demonstrated need for facilities and services in the community to help people with mental illness, individuals with developmental disabilities, and other vulnerable populations, including foster children, homeless families, veterans, and others in critical need. The need includes, but is not limited to, funding for mental health services, evaluation and treatment facilities, housing, and other projects and services for those in need.

(c) There is also a need to provide public and educational benefits and economic support for cultural organizations. Providing local support for the state's cultural organizations is in the public interest and will serve multiple public purposes including, among others, enhancing and extending the education reach and offerings of cultural organizations; ensuring continued and expanded access to the facilities and programs of cultural organizations by economically and geographically underserved populations; and providing financial stability to the organizations to continue and extend the numerous public benefits they provide.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature to provide local governments and the communities they serve the fiscal tools needed to provide these important services.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 24 s 101.]

NOTES:

Construction—2015 3rd sp.s. c 24: See note following RCW 36.160.030.